ne_affix.dat
SET UTF-8

SFX A Y 98
SFX A ् /I ्
SFX A 0 /Ij .
SFX A 0 नै .
SFX A ् /iI ्
SFX A 0 /Ii .
SFX A 0 /Hi .
SFX A 0 /I .
SFX A 0 दी ् +अकर्मक
SFX A 0 /I ्
SFX A 0 दो ्
SFX A 0 छु ्
SFX A 0 छौ ्
SFX A 0 छौँ ्
SFX A 0 छस् ्
SFX A 0 छेस् ्
SFX A 0 छ ्
SFX A 0 छ्यौ ्
SFX A 0 छन् ्
SFX A 0 छे ्
SFX A 0 छिन् ्
SFX A ् ेन ्
SFX A ् ेनौ ्
SFX A ् ेनौँ ्
SFX A 0 यौँ ्
SFX A 0 यौ ्
SFX A ् /IK ्
SFX A ् ेनन् ्
SFX A ् ेछ ्
SFX A ् ेछौँ ्
SFX A ् ेछौ ्
SFX A ् ेछन् ्
SFX A 0 नेछैन ्
SFX A 0 यो ्
SFX A ् िन् ्
SFX A ् िन ्
SFX A ् िँन ्
SFX A ् िनस् ्
SFX A ् िनौ ्
SFX A ् िनन् ्
SFX A ् िस् ्
SFX A ् िनेछ ्
SFX A ् िदिए ्
SFX A ् िदिएको ्
SFX A ् िदिने ्
SFX A ् िदिन्न ्
SFX A ् िएला ्
SFX A ् िछस् ्
SFX A ् िछ ्
SFX A ् िन्छ ्
SFX A ् िछन् ्
SFX A ् िरहेको ्
SFX A ् िरहेछ ्
SFX A ् िरहेका ्
SFX A ् िरहेकी ्
SFX A ् िसकेको ्
SFX A ् िनसकेको ्
SFX A ् िसकेका ्
SFX A ् िनसकेका ्
SFX A ् िसकेकी ्
SFX A ् िनसकेकी ्
SFX A ् िसक्यो ्
SFX A ् िसक्नेछ ्
SFX A ् िसक्नुभयो ्
SFX A ् िसकेछ ्
SFX A ् ूँ ्
SFX A ् ून् ्
SFX A 0 नेछ ्
SFX A 0 नेछौ ्
SFX A 0 नेछौँ ्
SFX A 0 नेछु ्
SFX A 0 नेछस् ्
SFX A 0 नेछैनौ ्
SFX A 0 नेछैनौँ ्
SFX A 0 नेछैनस् ्
SFX A 0 नेछैनन् ्
SFX A 0 थिस् ्
SFX A 0 थ्यौ ्
SFX A 0 थ्यौँ ्
SFX A 0 थे ्
SFX A 0 थेँ ्
SFX A 0 थ्यो ्
SFX A 0 थी ्
SFX A 0 थिन् ्
SFX A 0 दैन ्
SFX A 0 दैनौ ्
SFX A 0 दैनौँ ्
SFX A 0 दिनौँ ्
SFX A 0 दिनौ ्
SFX A 0 दैनन् ्
SFX A 0 दैछ ्
SFX A 0 दैछन् ्
SFX A 0 दैछिन् ्
SFX A 0 दैछौ ्
SFX A 0 दैछु ्
SFX A 0 दैछौँ ्
SFX A 0 दैनथ्यो ्
SFX A 0 दैनथे ्
SFX A 0 दैनथी ्

SFX a Y 10
SFX a ् री ्
SFX a ् ै ्
SFX a ् ो ्
SFX a ् को ्
SFX a ् का ्
SFX a ् की ्
SFX a ् ले ्
SFX a ् 0 ्
SFX a ् मा ्
SFX a ् लाई ्

SFX B Y 2
SFX B 0 हाँ .
SFX B 0 हीँ .

SFX c Y 11
SFX c 0 ेरो .
SFX c 0 ेरा .
SFX c 0 ेरी .
SFX c 0 ैले .
SFX c 0 ले ी
SFX c 0 ै .
SFX c ँ ैँ ँ
SFX c ँ ेरो ँ
SFX c ँ ेरा ँ
SFX c ँ ेरी ँ
SFX c ँ ैँले ँ

SFX D Y 5
SFX D ी ्रो ी
SFX D ी ्रा ी
SFX D ी ्री ी
SFX D 0 ले .
SFX D 0 लाई .

SFX d Y 143
SFX d 0 /Ij .
SFX d 0 /Ii .
SFX d 0 /J .
SFX d 0 नगयो .
SFX d 0 नपुग्यो .
SFX d 0 /I .
SFX d 0 ेन [^ुइिा]
SFX d 0 /IJ [^ुइिा]
SFX d 0 /i [^ुइिा]
SFX d 0 /Ii [^ुइिा]
SFX d 0 /I [^ुइि]
SFX d 0 ँदी .
SFX d 0 ँदो .
SFX d 0 न्छु .
SFX d 0 न्छौ .
SFX d 0 न्छौं .
SFX d 0 न्छस् .
SFX d 0 न्छेस् .
SFX d 0 न्छ .
SFX d 0 न्छ्यौ .
SFX d 0 न्छन् .
SFX d 0 न्छिन् .
SFX d 0 ेन [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ेनौ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ेनौँ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ्यौँ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ्यो [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 /K [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ेनन् [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 /I [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ौँ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िनेछ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 नेछौ .
SFX d 0 नेछौँ .
SFX d 0 नेछ .
SFX d 0 नेछु .
SFX d 0 नेछस् .
SFX d 0 नेछैनौ .
SFX d 0 नेछैन .
SFX d 0 नेछैनौँ .
SFX d 0 नेछैनस् .
SFX d 0 नेछैनन् .
SFX d 0 ेछ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ेछौँ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ेछौ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 ेछन् [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िछ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िछस् [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िछन् [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िरहेको [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िरहेछ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िरहेका [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िरहेकी [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िसकेको [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िदिए [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िसकेका [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िसकेकी [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िसक्यो [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िसक्नेछ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िसक्नुभयो [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 िसकेछ [^ुाइि]
SFX d 0 न्थिस् .
SFX d 0 न्थ्यौ .
SFX d 0 न्थ्यौँ .
SFX d 0 न्थे .
SFX d 0 न्थेँ .
SFX d 0 न्थ्यो .
SFX d 0 न्थी .
SFX d 0 न्थिन् .
SFX d 0 ँदैन .
SFX d 0 ँदैनौ .
SFX d 0 ँदैनौँ .
SFX d 0 ँदिनौँ .
SFX d 0 ँदिनौ [^इि]
SFX d 0 ँदैनन् .
SFX d 0 ँदैछ .
SFX d 0 ँदैछे .
SFX d 0 ँदैछौ .
SFX d 0 ँदैछु .
SFX d 0 ँदैछौँ .
SFX d 0 ँदैनथ्यो .
SFX d 0 ँदैनथे .
SFX d 0 ँदैनथी .
SFX d 0 /I [िाइ]
SFX d 0 एन [ाइि]
SFX d 0 एनौ [ाइि]
SFX d 0 एनौँ [ाइि]
SFX d 0 यौँ [ाइि]
SFX d 0 यो [ाइि]
SFX d 0 /IK [ाइि]
SFX d 0 एनन् [ाइि]
SFX d 0 /I [ाइि]
SFX d 0 यो इ
SFX d 0 इयो [िा]
SFX d 0 /I [इि]
SFX d 0 एछ [ाइि]
SFX d 0 एछौँ [ाइि]
SFX d 0 एछौ [ाइि]
SFX d 0 एछन् [ाइि]
SFX d 0 छ इ
SFX d 0 छस् इ
SFX d 0 छन् इ
SFX d 0 इछन् [िा]
SFX d 0 /I [िा]
SFX d 0 /I इ
SFX d 0 /I [^ाुइि]
SFX d 0 िन् [^ाुइि]
SFX d 0 िन [^ाुइि]
SFX d 0 िँन [^ाुइि]
SFX d 0 िनस् [^ाुइि]
SFX d 0 न् इ
SFX d 0 इन् [िा]
SFX d 0 न इ
SFX d 0 इन [िा]
SFX d 0 इने [िा]
SFX d 0 ँन इ
SFX d 0 इँन [िा]
SFX d 0 नस् इ
SFX d 0 इनस् [िा]
SFX d 0 नौ इ
SFX d 0 इनौ [िा]
SFX d 0 नन् इ
SFX d 0 इनन् [िा]
SFX d 0 स् इ
SFX d 0 इस् [िा]
SFX d 0 ऊन् [ाइि]
SFX d 0 इछ [िा]
SFX d 0 इरहेको [िा]
SFX d 0 इरहेछ [िा]
SFX d 0 इरहेका [िा]
SFX d 0 इरहेकी [िा]
SFX d 0 इसकेको [िा]
SFX d 0 इसकेका [िा]
SFX d 0 इसकेकी [िा]
SFX d 0 इसक्यो [िा]
SFX d 0 इसक्नेछ [िा]
SFX d 0 इसक्नुभयो [िा]
SFX d 0 इसकेछ [िा]
SFX d 0 इदिए [िा]
SFX d 0 इछस् [िा]
SFX d 0 इनेछ [िा]
SFX d 0 /I [ाि]
SFX d 0 /J [ाइि]

SFX E Y 87
SFX E 0 /HIj .
SFX E 0 /j .
SFX E 0 /Ii .
SFX E 0 /I .
SFX E उ /I उ
SFX E उ एन उ
SFX E उ /Im उ
SFX E 0 ँदी उ
SFX E 0 /I उ
SFX E 0 ँदो उ
SFX E 0 ँछु उ
SFX E 0 ँछौ उ
SFX E 0 ँछौँ उ
SFX E 0 ँछेस् उ
SFX E 0 ँछस् उ
SFX E 0 ँछ उ
SFX E 0 ँछे उ
SFX E 0 ँछ्यौ उ
SFX E 0 ँछन् उ
SFX E 0 ँछिन् उ
SFX E उ एनौ उ
SFX E उ एनौँ उ
SFX E उ यौँ उ
SFX E उ यौ उ
SFX E उ /IK उ
SFX E उ यो उ
SFX E उ एनन् उ
SFX E 0 नेछन् उ
SFX E 0 नेछ उ
SFX E 0 नेछु उ
SFX E 0 नेछौ उ
SFX E 0 नेछौँ उ
SFX E 0 नेछस् उ
SFX E 0 नेछैनन् उ
SFX E 0 नेछैनस् उ
SFX E 0 नेछैनौ उ
SFX E 0 नेछैनौँ उ
SFX E उ एछ उ
SFX E उ एछौँ उ
SFX E उ एछन् उ
SFX E 0 ँथिस् उ
SFX E 0 ँथ्यौ उ
SFX E 0 ँथे उ
SFX E 0 ँथ्यो उ
SFX E 0 ँथ्यौँ उ
SFX E 0 ँथी उ
SFX E 0 ँथिन् उ
SFX E 0 ँदैन उ
SFX E 0 ँदैनौ उ
SFX E 0 ँदैनौँ उ
SFX E 0 ँदैनन् उ
SFX E 0 ँदैछ उ
SFX E 0 ँदैछु उ
SFX E 0 ँदैछौ उ
SFX E 0 ँदैछौँ उ
SFX E 0 ँदैनथ्यो उ
SFX E 0 ँदैनथे उ
SFX E 0 ँदैनथी उ
SFX E 0 ँदिनौ उ
SFX E 0 ँदिन उ
SFX E 0 ँदिनन् उ
SFX E उ एछौ उ
SFX E 0 नेछैन उ
SFX E उ इन उ
SFX E उ इन् उ
SFX E उ इनस् उ
SFX E उ इनन् उ
SFX E उ इँन उ
SFX E उ इनौ उ
SFX E उ इस् उ
SFX E उ ई उ
SFX E उ इनेछ उ
SFX E उ इछ उ
SFX E उ इछस् उ
SFX E उ इछन् उ
SFX E उ इरहेको उ
SFX E उ इदिए उ
SFX E उ इरहेछ उ
SFX E उ इरहेका उ
SFX E उ इरहेकी उ
SFX E उ इसकेको उ
SFX E उ इसकेका उ
SFX E उ इसकेकी उ
SFX E उ इसक्यो उ
SFX E उ इसक्नेछ उ
SFX E उ इसक्नुभयो उ
SFX E उ इसकेछ उ

SFX e Y 31
SFX e 0 /I [^ि]
SFX e 0 एन .
SFX e 0 एनौ .
SFX e 0 एनौँ .
SFX e 0 यौँ .
SFX e 0 यो .
SFX e 0 /IK .
SFX e 0 एँ .
SFX e 0 एनन् .
SFX e 0 इयो [^ि]
SFX e 0 योस् [^ि]
SFX e 0 एछ [^ि]
SFX e 0 एछौँ [^ि]
SFX e 0 एछौ [^ि]
SFX e 0 एछन् [^ि]
SFX e 0 इछन् [^ि]
SFX e 0 /I [ो]
SFX e 0 /I .
SFX e 0 इन् .
SFX e 0 इन .
SFX e 0 इँन .
SFX e 0 इनस् .
SFX e 0 इनौ .
SFX e 0 इनन् .
SFX e 0 इस् .
SFX e 0 ई .
SFX e 0 इछ [^ि]
SFX e 0 इछस् [^ि]
SFX e 0 इनेछ [^ि]
SFX e 0 /JI [^ि]
SFX e 0 /i [^ि]

SFX F Y 48
SFX F 0 /Ij .
SFX F 0 /Ii .
SFX F 0 /J .
SFX F 0 /I .
SFX F 0 ँदी .
SFX F 0 ँदो .
SFX F 0 न्छु [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्छौ [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्छौं [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्छस् [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्छेस् [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्छ [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्छ्यौ [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्छन् [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्छिन् [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछौ [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछौँ [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछ [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछु [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछस् [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछैनौ [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछैन [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछैनौँ [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछैनस् [^इ]
SFX F 0 नेछैनन् [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्थिस् [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्थ्यौ [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्थ्यौँ [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्थे [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्थेँ [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्थ्यो [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्थी [^इ]
SFX F 0 न्थिन् [^इ]
SFX F 0 ँदैन .
SFX F 0 ँदैनौ .
SFX F 0 ँदैनौँ .11
SFX F 0 ँदिनौँ .
SFX F 0 ँदिनौ .
SFX F 0 ँदैनन् .
SFX F 0 ँदैछ .
SFX F 0 ँदैछे .
SFX F 0 ँदैछौ .
SFX F 0 ँदैछु .
SFX F 0 ँदैछौँ .
SFX F 0 ँदैनथ्यो .
SFX F 0 ँदैनथे .
SFX F 0 ँदैनथी .
SFX F 0 /I [^इ]

SFX G Y 6
SFX G 0 को .
SFX G 0 कै [^ेन]
SFX G 0 का .
SFX G 0 की [^ि]
SFX G 0 ले [^ा]
SFX G 0 ै [^ँेिा]

SFX g Y 2
SFX g ो ा ो
SFX g ो ी ो

SFX H Y 15
SFX H 0 को .
SFX H 0 का .
SFX H 0 की .
SFX H 0 मा .
SFX H 0 ले .
SFX H 0 लाई .
SFX H 0 बाट .
SFX H 0 सँग .
SFX H 0 सँगको .
SFX H 0 सँगका .
SFX H 0 सँगै .
SFX H 0 द्वारा .
SFX H 0 सित .
SFX H 0 सहित .
SFX H 0 बिना .

SFX h Y 9
SFX h 0 बाट .
SFX h 0 सित .
SFX h 0 सँग .
SFX h 0 सँगै .
SFX h 0 द्वारा .
SFX h 0 कहाँ .
SFX h 0 मा .
SFX h 0 जस्तो .
SFX h 0 भित्र .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I 0 न .

SFX i Y 19
SFX i 0 हरू .
SFX i 0 हरूदेखि .
SFX i 0 हरूप्रति .
SFX i 0 हरूबारे .
SFX i 0 हरूबारेको .
SFX i 0 हरूसमेत .
SFX i 0 हरूबीच .
SFX i 0 हरूको .
SFX i 0 हरूका .
SFX i 0 हरूले .
SFX i 0 हरूलाई .
SFX i 0 हरूबाट .
SFX i 0 हरूसँग .
SFX i 0 हरूसँगको .
SFX i 0 हरूसँगै .
SFX i 0 हरूद्वारा .
SFX i 0 हरूसित .
SFX i 0 हरूमा .
SFX i 0 हरूमाथि .

SFX J Y 10
SFX J 0 ले .
SFX J 0 लाई .
SFX J 0 बाट .
SFX J 0 सँग .
SFX J 0 सँगै .
SFX J 0 द्वारा .
SFX J 0 सित .
SFX J 0 मा .
SFX J 0 को .
SFX J 0 का .

SFX j Y 19
SFX j 0 अघि .
SFX j 0 हुनेछ .
SFX j 0 भएको .
SFX j 0 भए .
SFX j 0 भएका .
SFX j 0 होस् .
SFX j 0 स् .
SFX j 0 हुन्छ .
SFX j 0 हुन्थ्यो .
SFX j 0 पर्थ्यो .
SFX j 0 पर्यो .
SFX j 0 पर्दैन .
SFX j 0 पर्दा .
SFX j 0 पर्ने .
SFX j 0 पर्नेमा .
SFX j 0 पर्नेछ .
SFX j 0 पर्छ .
SFX j 0 भयो .
SFX j 0 भन्दा .

SFX K Y 11
SFX K 0 पछि .
SFX K 0 पछिका .
SFX K 0 अघि .
SFX K 0 अघिका .
SFX K 0 जस्तो .
SFX K 0 देखि .
SFX K 0 मात्र .
SFX K 0 सम्म .
SFX K 0 सम्बन्धि .
SFX K 0 प्रति .
SFX K 0 बारे .

SFX k Y 47
SFX k 0 पट्टि .
SFX k 0 मध्ये .
SFX k 0 पनि .
SFX k 0 तर्फ .
SFX k 0 बीच .
SFX k 0 पछि .
SFX k 0 मार्फत .
SFX k 0 माथि .
SFX k 0 माथिबाट .
SFX k 0 माथिको .
SFX k 0 माथिका .
SFX k 0 झैँ .
SFX k 0 मै .
SFX k 0 अघि .
SFX k 0 अघिदेखि .
SFX k 0 पछिका .
SFX k 0 पछिको .
SFX k 0 पछिकी .
SFX k 0 जस्तो .
SFX k 0 जस्ता .
SFX k 0 जस्तै .
SFX k 0 देखि .
SFX k 0 मात्र .
SFX k 0 सम्म .
SFX k 0 सम्ममा .
SFX k 0 सम्मको .
SFX k 0 सम्मका .
SFX k 0 भित्र .
SFX k 0 भित्रमा .
SFX k 0 भित्रको .
SFX k 0 भित्रका .
SFX k 0 भित्रै .
SFX k 0 प्रति .
SFX k 0 भन्दा .
SFX k 0 भन्दापर .
SFX k 0 बारे .
SFX k 0 समेत .
SFX k 0 कै .
SFX k 0 लगायत .
SFX k 0 लगायतका .
SFX k 0 सम्बन्धी .
SFX k 0 तिर .
SFX k 0 बाहेक .
SFX k 0 सहित .
SFX k 0 सहितका .
SFX k 0 सहितको .
SFX k 0 अनुसार .

SFX L Y 1
SFX L 0 /l .

SFX l Y 134
SFX l 0 /H .
SFX l 0 /Hi .
SFX l 0 दी .
SFX l 0 दै .
SFX l 0 दा .
SFX l 0 दो .
SFX l 0 न्छु [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछु [उ]
SFX l 0 न्छौ [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछौ [उ]
SFX l 0 न्छस् [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछस् [उ]
SFX l 0 न्छौँ [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछौँ [उ]
SFX l 0 न्छेस् [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछेस् [उ]
SFX l 0 न्छ [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछ [उ]
SFX l 0 न्छ्यौ [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछ्यौ [उ]
SFX l 0 ँछे [उ]
SFX l 0 न्छन् [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछन् [उ]
SFX l 0 न्छिन् [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँछिन् [उ]
SFX l 0 नेछौँ .
SFX l 0 नेछौ .
SFX l 0 नेछ .
SFX l 0 नेछस् .
SFX l 0 नेछैनौ .
SFX l 0 नेछैनौँ .
SFX l 0 नेछैनस् .
SFX l 0 नेछैनन् .
SFX l 0 ँथिस् [उ]
SFX l 0 न्थिस् [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँथ्यौ [उ]
SFX l 0 न्थ्यौ [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँथ्यौँ [उ]
SFX l 0 न्थ्यौँ [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँथे [उ]
SFX l 0 न्थे [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँथ्यो [उ]
SFX l 0 न्थ्यो [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँथी [उ]
SFX l 0 न्थी [^उ]
SFX l 0 ँथिन् [उ]
SFX l 0 न्थिन् [^उ]
SFX l 0 दैन .
SFX l 0 दैनौ .
SFX l 0 दैनौँ .
SFX l 0 दिनौ .
SFX l 0 दैनन् .
SFX l 0 दैछ .
SFX l 0 दैछु .
SFX l 0 दैछौँ .
SFX l 0 नेछु .
SFX l 0 दैनथ्यो .
SFX l 0 दैनथे .
SFX l 0 दैनथी .
SFX l 0 यौँ [इि]
SFX l 0 ्यौँ [^उइि]
SFX l 0 यौ [इि]
SFX l 0 ्यौ [^उइि]
SFX l 0 यो [इि]
SFX l 0 ्यो [^उइि]
SFX l 0 ेर [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एर [िइ]
SFX l 0 ेन [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एन [िइ]
SFX l 0 े [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 ए [िइ]
SFX l 0 ेनन् [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एनन् [िइ]
SFX l 0 ेनौँ [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एनौँ [िइ]
SFX l 0 ेनौ [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एनौ [िइ]
SFX l 0 ेस् [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एस् [िइ]
SFX l 0 ोस् .
SFX l 0 ेछ [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एछ [िइ]
SFX l 0 ेछौँ [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एछौँ [िइ]
SFX l 0 ेछन् [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एछन् [िइ]
SFX l 0 ेछौ [^िइउ]
SFX l 0 एछौ [िइ]
SFX l 0 नेछैन .
SFX l 0 ुञ्जेल [^उिइ]
SFX l 0 ञ्जेल [उ]
SFX l 0 उञ्जेल [ि]
SFX l 0 िञ्जेल [^उिइ]
SFX l 0 इञ्जेल [ि]
SFX l उ इञ्जेल [उ]
SFX l 0 िन् [^उइि]
SFX l उ इन् [उ]
SFX l 0 िन [^उइि]
SFX l उ इन [उ]
SFX l 0 िनस् [^उइि]
SFX l उ इनस् [उ]
SFX l उ इँन [उ]
SFX l 0 िँन [^उइि]
SFX l 0 िनौ [^उइि]
SFX l उ इनौ [उ]
SFX l 0 िनन् [^उइि]
SFX l उ इनन् [उ]
SFX l 0 िस् [^उइि]
SFX l उ इस् [उ]
SFX l 0 िनेछ [^उइि]
SFX l उ इनेछ [उ]
SFX l 0 िएला [^उइि]
SFX l उ इएला [उ]
SFX l उ ऊ [उ]
SFX l 0 ुन् [^उिइ]
SFX l 0 उन् [ि]
SFX l उ उन् [उ]
SFX l 0 िछस् [^उइि]
SFX l उ इछस् [उ]
SFX l 0 िछन् [^उइि]
SFX l उ इछन् [उ]
SFX l 0 िछ [^उइि]
SFX l उ इछ [उ]
SFX l उ ऊँ [उ]
SFX l 0 ऊँ [ि]
SFX l 0 ूँ [^उिइ]
SFX l 0 ेको [^इिउ]
SFX l 0 एको [इि]
SFX l 0 ेका [^इिउ]
SFX l 0 एका [इि]
SFX l 0 ला [^इि]
SFX l 0 एला [इि]
SFX l 0 न .
SFX l 0 नेबारे .

SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 /l .
